Massachusetts, session 194th, S1412.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall
be a commission established pursuant to section 2A of chapter 4 of the General Laws to study
the availability of a continuum of care for persons with substance use disorder. The commission
shall study and make recommendations on:
(i) the regional availability of detoxification services, clinical stabilization services,
transitional support services, residential recovery home services and outpatient treatment
including medication assisted treatment.
(ii) create an assessment of the appropriate capacity should be for each level of care
to allow individuals to efficiently access each level of care as clinically necessary.
of 3

(iii) identify institutional barriers within recovery programs that individuals face as
they progress through the treatment spectrum, including funding, program space, transit options,
and housing availability.
(b) The commission shall consist of:
the House and Senate chairs of the Committee on Mental Health, Substance Use and
Recovery, who shall serve as co-chairs;
a member appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;
a member appointed by the Senate President;
the minority leader of the House, or a designee;
the minority leader of the Senate, or a designee;
the Secretary of the Office of Health and Human services, or a designee;
the Assistant Secretary for MassHealth;
the Director of the Massachusetts Bureau of Substance Addiction Services
the Commissioner of the Department of Public Health, or a designee;
the Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health, or a designee;
the Commissioner of the Division of insurance, or a designee;
the Mayor of Boston, or a designee;
and one from each of the following:
of 3

Association for Behavioral Healthcare, Inc.;
Massachusetts Organization for Addiction Recovery;
the Massachusetts Health & Hospital Association;
the Massachusetts Medical Society;
Volunteers of America Massachusetts;
Learn to Cope;
RIZE Massachusetts;
the Grayken Center for Addiction at Boston Medical Center;
the Massachusetts Association of Health Plans; and
Blue Cross and Blue Shield of Massachusetts.
(c) All appointments shall be made not later than 30 days after the effective date of this
section. The co-chairs shall convene the first meeting of the special commission within 45 days
after all appointments have been made.
(d) The commission shall submit a detailed report with its proposals and
recommendations, along with drafts of legislation necessary to carry out its recommendations, to
the clerks of the Senate and House of Representatives, the Joint Committee on Mental Health,
Substance Use and Recovery and the Governor not later that one year following the
establishment of said commission. The commission shall monitor the implementation of its
recommendations.
of 3